Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2706
Conviction in felony cases; fines and costs; collection from defendant; disposition of amount collected.

In any case of indictment for felony, where the defendant shall be convicted, it shall be the duty of the county attorney, clerk of the court, and sheriff of the county to use all lawful means within the scope of their respective powers, if need be, for the collection of the costs from the defendant, and the fine also, if any shall have been adjudged against him. When the costs shall have been collected, if the same shall have been allowed for payment from the county treasurer as provided in section 29-2705, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court to certify and pay the same immediately to the county treasurer, together with any fine that may have been collected in the case.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 538, p. 841;

R.S.1913, § 9242;

C.S.1922, § 10271;

C.S.1929, § 29-2706;

R.S.1943, § 29-2706.